hunspell/hr_HR/hr_HR.aff
FLAG long
SFX WX Y      20
SFX WX iti    im         iti
SFX WX iti    iš         iti
SFX WX iti    i          iti
SFX WX iti    imo        iti
SFX WX iti    ite        iti
SFX WX iti    e          iti
SFX WX iti    ih         iti
SFX WX iti    ismo       iti
SFX WX iti    iste       iti
SFX WX iti    iše        iti
SFX WX iti    i          iti
SFX WX iti    imo        iti
SFX WX iti    ite        iti
SFX WX iti    io         iti
SFX WX iti    ila        iti
SFX WX iti    ilo        iti
SFX WX iti    ili        iti
SFX WX iti    ile        iti
SFX WX iti    ivši       iti
SFX WX iti    it         iti

SFX WW Y      39
SFX WW uti    em         nuti
SFX WW uti    eš         nuti
SFX WW uti    e          nuti
SFX WW uti    emo        nuti
SFX WW uti    ete        nuti
SFX WW uti    u          nuti
SFX WW uti    pem        suti
SFX WW uti    peš        suti
SFX WW uti    pe         suti
SFX WW uti    pemo       suti
SFX WW uti    pete       suti
SFX WW uti    pu         suti
SFX WW ti     jem        [bčz]uti
SFX WW ti     ješ        [bčz]uti
SFX WW ti     je         [bčz]uti
SFX WW ti     jemo       [bčz]uti
SFX WW ti     jete       [bčz]uti
SFX WW ti     ju         [bčz]uti
SFX WW ti     h          ti
SFX WW uti    u          uti
SFX WW ti     smo        ti
SFX WW ti     ste        ti
SFX WW ti     še         ti
SFX WW uti    i          nuti
SFX WW uti    imo        nuti
SFX WW uti    ite        nuti
SFX WW uti    pi         suti
SFX WW uti    pimo       suti
SFX WW uti    pite       suti
SFX WW ti     j          [bčz]uti
SFX WW ti     jmo        [bčz]uti
SFX WW ti     jte        [bčz]uti
SFX WW ti     o          ti
SFX WW ti     la         ti
SFX WW ti     lo         ti
SFX WW ti     li         ti
SFX WW ti     le         ti
SFX WW ti     vši        ti
SFX WW ti     t          ti

SFX WV Y      21
SFX WV ijeti  em         ijeti
SFX WV ijeti  eš         ijeti
SFX WV ijeti  e          ijeti
SFX WV ijeti  emo        ijeti
SFX WV ijeti  ete        ijeti
SFX WV ijeti  u          ijeti
SFX WV ti     h          ijeti
SFX WV ijeti  ije        ijeti
SFX WV ti     smo        ijeti
SFX WV ti     ste        ijeti
SFX WV ti     še         ijeti
SFX WV ijeti  i          ijeti
SFX WV ijeti  imo        ijeti
SFX WV ijeti  ite        ijeti
SFX WV ijeti  o          ijeti
SFX WV ijeti  la         ijeti
SFX WV ijeti  lo         ijeti
SFX WV ijeti  li         ijeti
SFX WV ijeti  le         ijeti
SFX WV ti     vši        ijeti
SFX WV ti     t          ijeti

SFX WU Y      21
SFX WU ti     jem        iti
SFX WU ti     ješ        iti
SFX WU ti     je         iti
SFX WU ti     jemo       iti
SFX WU ti     jete       iti
SFX WU ti     ju         iti
SFX WU ti     h          iti
SFX WU iti    i          iti
SFX WU ti     smo        iti
SFX WU ti     ste        iti
SFX WU ti     še         iti
SFX WU ti     j          iti
SFX WU ti     jmo        iti
SFX WU ti     jte        iti
SFX WU ti     o          iti
SFX WU ti     la         iti
SFX WU ti     lo         iti
SFX WU ti     li         iti
SFX WU ti     le         iti
SFX WU ti     vši        iti
SFX WU ti     t          iti

SFX WT Y      21
SFX WT jeti   im         jeti
SFX WT jeti   iš         jeti
SFX WT jeti   i          jeti
SFX WT jeti   imo        jeti
SFX WT jeti   ite        jeti
SFX WT jeti   e          jeti
SFX WT jeti   jeh        jeti
SFX WT jeti   je         jeti
SFX WT jeti   jesmo      jeti
SFX WT jeti   jeste      jeti
SFX WT jeti   ješe       jeti
SFX WT jeti   i          jeti
SFX WT jeti   imo        jeti
SFX WT jeti   ite        jeti
SFX WT jeti   io         jeti
SFX WT jeti   jela       jeti
SFX WT jeti   jelo       jeti
SFX WT jeti   jeli       jeti
SFX WT jeti   jele       jeti
SFX WT ti     vši        jeti
SFX WT ti     t          jeti

SFX WS Y      21
SFX WS ijeti  esem       ijeti
SFX WS ijeti  eseš       ijeti
SFX WS ijeti  ese        ijeti
SFX WS ijeti  esemo      ijeti
SFX WS ijeti  esete      ijeti
SFX WS ijeti  esu        ijeti
SFX WS ijeti  ijeh       ijeti
SFX WS ijeti  ije        ijeti
SFX WS ijeti  ijesmo     ijeti
SFX WS ijeti  ijeste     ijeti
SFX WS ijeti  iješe      ijeti
SFX WS ijeti  esi        ijeti
SFX WS ijeti  esimo      ijeti
SFX WS ijeti  esite      ijeti
SFX WS ijeti  io         ijeti
SFX WS ijeti  ijela      ijeti
SFX WS ijeti  ijelo      ijeti
SFX WS ijeti  ijeli      ijeti
SFX WS ijeti  ijele      ijeti
SFX WS ti     vši        ijeti
SFX WS ti     t          ijeti

SFX WR Y      21
SFX WR jeti   ijem       jeti
SFX WR jeti   iješ       jeti
SFX WR jeti   ije        jeti
SFX WR jeti   ijemo      jeti
SFX WR jeti   ijete      jeti
SFX WR jeti   iju        jeti
SFX WR jeti   jeh        jeti
SFX WR jeti   je         jeti
SFX WR jeti   jesmo      jeti
SFX WR jeti   jeste      jeti
SFX WR jeti   ješe       jeti
SFX WR jeti   ij         jeti
SFX WR jeti   ijmo       jeti
SFX WR jeti   ijte       jeti
SFX WR jeti   io         jeti
SFX WR jeti   jela       jeti
SFX WR jeti   jelo       jeti
SFX WR jeti   jeli       jeti
SFX WR jeti   jele       jeti
SFX WR ti     vši        jeti
SFX WR ti     t          jeti

SFX WQ Y      20
SFX WQ eti    em         eti
SFX WQ eti    eš         eti
SFX WQ eti    e          eti
SFX WQ eti    emo        eti
SFX WQ eti    ete        eti
SFX WQ eti    u          eti
SFX WQ eti    eh         eti
SFX WQ eti    esmo       eti
SFX WQ eti    este       eti
SFX WQ eti    eše        eti
SFX WQ eti    i          eti
SFX WQ eti    imo        eti
SFX WQ eti    ite        eti
SFX WQ eti    eo         eti
SFX WQ eti    ela        eti
SFX WQ eti    elo        eti
SFX WQ eti    eli        eti
SFX WQ eti    ele        eti
SFX WQ eti    evši       eti
SFX WQ eti    et         eti

SFX WP Y      21
SFX WP eti    anjem      eti
SFX WP eti    anješ      eti
SFX WP eti    anje       eti
SFX WP eti    anjemo     eti
SFX WP eti    anjete     eti
SFX WP eti    anju       eti
SFX WP eti    eh         eti
SFX WP eti    e          eti
SFX WP eti    esmo       eti
SFX WP eti    este       eti
SFX WP eti    eše        eti
SFX WP eti    anji       eti
SFX WP eti    anjimo     eti
SFX WP eti    anjite     eti
SFX WP eti    eo         eti
SFX WP eti    ela        eti
SFX WP eti    elo        eti
SFX WP eti    eli        eti
SFX WP eti    ele        eti
SFX WP eti    evši       eti
SFX WP eti    et         eti

SFX WO Y      21
SFX WO ljeti  eljem      ljeti
SFX WO ljeti  elješ      ljeti
SFX WO ljeti  elje       ljeti
SFX WO ljeti  eljemo     ljeti
SFX WO ljeti  eljete     ljeti
SFX WO ljeti  elju       ljeti
SFX WO ljeti  eljah      ljeti
SFX WO ljeti  eljaše     ljeti
SFX WO ljeti  eljasmo    ljeti
SFX WO ljeti  eljaste    ljeti
SFX WO ljeti  eljahu     ljeti
SFX WO ljeti  elji       ljeti
SFX WO ljeti  eljimo     ljeti
SFX WO ljeti  eljite     ljeti
SFX WO ljeti  ljeo       ljeti
SFX WO ljeti  ljela      ljeti
SFX WO ljeti  ljelo      ljeti
SFX WO ljeti  ljeli      ljeti
SFX WO ljeti  ljele      ljeti
SFX WO ljeti  evši       ljeti
SFX WO ljeti  ljet       ljeti

SFX WN Y      13
SFX WN eti    im         eti
SFX WN eti    iš         eti
SFX WN eti    i          eti
SFX WN eti    imo        eti
SFX WN eti    ite        eti
SFX WN eti    iju        eti
SFX WN eti    io         eti
SFX WN eti    ila        eti
SFX WN eti    ilo        eti
SFX WN eti    ili        eti
SFX WN eti    ile        eti
SFX WN eti    ivši       eti
SFX WN eti    it         eti

AF WX	# 128
AF WXXJ	# 129
AF WXWU	# 133
AF WW	# 137
AF WWUO	# 139
AF WWUM	# 140
AF WV	# 143
AF WVXJ	# 144
AF WU	# 145
AF WUUO	# 146
AF WT	# 147
AF WS	# 148
AF WR	# 149
AF WQ	# 150
AF WQWN	# 151
AF WP	# 152
AF WO	# 153
